apertium-miq.miq.twol
Alphabet
 A Â B D H I Î K L M N G P Q R S T U Û W Y
 a â b d h i î k l m n g p q r s t u û w y

 %>:0
 %{A%}:a  %{A%}:0
 %{S%}:s  %{S%}:0
 %{I%}:i  %{I%}:0 ;


Sets

Vowel = A Â I Î U Û
        a â i î u û ;

Rules

"a outputs as nothing after i-stem verbs"
%{A%}:0 <=> [ :Vowel - :u ] %>: _ ;

"S outputs as nothing after i-stem verbs"
%{S%}:s <=> [ :Vowel - :u ] %>: _ ;

"I outputs as nothing after vowels"
%{I%}:0 <=> :Vowel %>: _ ;

!"A outputs as i before ka"
!%{a%}:i <=> _ :{ka} %>: ;

! "Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending stem"
! i:0 <=> Vow %{VSUF%}:0 _ [ m | n ] ;

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst

! https://omniglot.com/writing/miskito.htm
